Hawaii, session 2026, SB771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201H-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The board of directors shall select a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its members[; provided that the chairperson shall be a public member.  The director of business, economic development, and tourism, director of finance, and the governor's representative shall be ineligible to serve as chairperson of the board]." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________